Utah statutes.
78B-1-104.   Jury composition.
(1)  A trial jury consists of:
(a)  twelve persons in a capital case;
(b)  eight persons in a noncapital first degree felony aggravated murder or
other criminal case which carries a term of incarceration of more than one
year as a possible sentence for the most serious offense charged;
(c)  six persons in a criminal case which carries a term of incarceration of
more than six months but not more than one year as a possible sentence for the
most serious offense charged;
(d)  four persons in a criminal case which carries a term of incarceration of
six months or less as a possible sentence for the most serious offense
charged; and
(e)  eight persons in a civil case at law except that the jury shall be four
persons in a civil case for damages of less than $20,000, exclusive of costs,
interest, and attorney fees.
(2)  Except in the trial of a capital felony, the parties may stipulate upon
the record to a jury of a lesser number than established by this section.
(3) (a)  The verdict in a criminal case shall be unanimous.
(b)  The verdict in a civil case shall be by not less than three-fourths of
the jurors.
(4)  There is no jury in the trial of small claims cases.
(5)  There is no jury in the adjudication of a minor charged with what would
constitute a crime if committed by an adult.
